District of Columbia statutes.
22-3403

Use of “District of Columbia” or similar designation by private detective or collection agency — Prosecutions for violations.

All prosecutions for violations of § 22-3401 shall be conducted in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any Assistant Corporation Counsel. As used in this section the term “Corporation Counsel” means the Attorney for the District of Columbia, by whatever title such attorney may be known, designated by the Mayor of the District of Columbia to perform the functions prescribed for the Corporation Counsel in this section.

Oct. 16, 1962, 76 Stat. 1071, Pub. L. 87-837, § 3
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 18, 41 DCR 1639
1981 Ed., § 22-3425.
1973 Ed., § 22-3425.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.